Illinois, session 104th, HB4336.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-12022 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12022)7    Sec. 5-12022. Building permit fee for veterans with a 8disability.9    (a) A veteran with a disability or the veteran's caregiver 10shall not be charged any building permit fees, including, but 11not limited to, permit fees, plan review or plan examination 12fees, inspection fees, and reinspection fees, fee for 13improvements to the residence of the veteran with a disability 14if the improvements are required to accommodate a disability 15of the veteran. Nothing in this subsection changes the 16obligation of any person to submit to the county applications, 17forms, or other paperwork to obtain a building permit. A 18veteran or caregiver must provide proof of veteran status and 19attest to the fact that the improvements to the residence are 20required to accommodate the veteran's disability. Proof of 21veteran status is to be construed liberally, and veteran 22status shall include service in the Armed Forces of the United 23States, National Guard, or the reserves of the Armed Forces of   HB4336 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16837 RTM 30246 b1the United States.2    (b) What constitutes proof of veteran status shall be 3determined by the county. The Illinois Department of Veterans 4Affairs may not adjudicate any dispute arising under 5subsection (a).6    (c) A home rule county may not regulate building permit 7fees in a manner inconsistent with this Section. This Section 8is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article 9VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by 10home rule units of powers and functions exercised by the 11State. 12(Source: P.A. 103-621, eff. 1-1-25; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25; 13104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 14    Section 10. The Township Code is amended by changing 15Section 110-17 as follows: 16    (60 ILCS 1/110-17)17    Sec. 110-17. Building permit fee for veterans with a 18disability. A veteran with a disability or the veteran's 19caregiver shall not be charged any building permit fees, 20including, but not limited to, permit fees, plan review or 21plan examination fees, inspection fees, reinspection fees, or 22other fees, fee for improvements to the residence of the 23veteran with a disability if the improvements are required to 24accommodate a disability of the veteran. Nothing in this   HB4336 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16837 RTM 30246 b1Section changes the obligation of any person to submit to the 2township applications, forms, or other paperwork to obtain a 3building permit. A veteran or caregiver must provide proof of 4veteran status and attest to the fact that the improvements to 5the residence are required to accommodate the veteran's 6disability. Proof of veteran status is to be construed 7liberally, and veteran status shall include service in the 8Armed Forces of the United States, National Guard, or the 9reserves of the Armed Forces of the United States. What 10constitutes proof of veteran status shall be determined by the 11township. The Illinois Department of Veterans Affairs may not 12adjudicate any dispute arising under this paragraph. 13(Source: P.A. 103-621, eff. 1-1-25; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 14    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 15changing Section 11-13-28 as follows: 16    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-28)17    Sec. 11-13-28. Building permit fee for veterans with a 18disability.19    (a) A veteran with a disability or the veteran's caregiver 20shall not be charged any building permit fees, including, but 21not limited to, permit fees, plan review or plan examination 22fees, inspection fees, reinspection fees, or other fees, fee 23for improvements to the residence of the veteran with a 24disability if the improvements are required to accommodate a   HB4336 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 16837 RTM 30246 b1disability of the veteran. Nothing in this subsection changes 2the obligation of any person to submit to the municipality 3applications, forms, or other paperwork to obtain a building 4permit. A veteran or caregiver must provide proof of veteran 5status and attest to the fact that the improvements to the 6residence are required to accommodate the veteran's 7disability. Proof of veteran status is to be construed 8liberally, and veteran status shall include service in the 9Armed Forces of the United States, National Guard, or the 10reserves of the Armed Forces of the United States.11    (b) What constitutes proof of veteran status shall be 12determined by the municipality. The Illinois Department of 13Veterans Affairs may not adjudicate any dispute arising under 14subsection (a).15    (c) A home rule municipality may not regulate building 16permit fees in a manner inconsistent with this Section. This 17Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 18Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 19exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 20by the State.21(Source: P.A. 103-621, eff. 1-1-25; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25; 22104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)